src/fst/morphology/compounding.lexc
LEXICON R
!+Cmp#:# # ; ! For turning off compounding during testing
! +Cmp#:# NounRoot ;
 +Cmp#:0# NounRoot ;
 +Cmp/Hyph#:0#- ProperNoun ;


LEXICON RHyph
 +Cmp/Hyph#:0#- NounRoot ;
 +Cmp/Hyph#:0#- ProperNoun ;

LEXICON RNum
      +Use/Circ+Cmp/Hyph#:%-# NounRoot ; ! For Num Cmp Noun, vi vil ikke ha Num Cmp Num 
